Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-427
Youth rehabilitation and treatment centers; five-year operations plan; reports.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop a five-year operations plan for the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers and submit such operations plans electronically to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature on or before March 15, 2021.

(2) The operations plan shall be developed with input from key stakeholders and shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) A description of the population served at each youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(b) An organizational chart of supervisors and operations staff. The operations plan shall not allow for administrative staff to have oversight over more than one youth rehabilitation and treatment center and shall not allow for clinical staff to have responsibility over more than one youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(c) Staff who shall be centralized offsite or managed onsite, including facility and maintenance staff;

(d) A facility plan that considers taxpayer investments already made in the facility and the community support and acceptance of the juveniles in the community surrounding the youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(e) A description of each rehabilitation program offered at the youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(f) A description of each mental health treatment plan offered at the youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(g) A description of reentry and discharge planning;

(h) A staffing plan that ensures adequate staffing;

(i) An education plan developed in collaboration with the State Department of Education;

(j) A capital improvements budget;

(k) An operating budget;

(l) A disaster recovery plan;

(m) A plan to segregate the juveniles by gender on separate campuses;

(n) A parenting plan for juveniles placed in a youth rehabilitation and treatment center who are parenting;

(o) A statement of the rights of juveniles placed at the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers, including a right to privacy, and the rights of parents or guardians;

(p) Quality and outcome measurements for tracking outcomes for juveniles when they are discharged from the youth rehabilitation and treatment center, including an exit survey of such juveniles;

(q) Key performance indicators to be included in the annual report required under this section;

(r) A requirement for trauma-informed training provided to staff;

(s) Methods and procedures for investigations at the youth rehabilitation and treatment center; and

(t) A grievance process for juveniles placed at the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers.

(3) The department shall submit a report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature on or before December 15, 2021, and each December 15 thereafter regarding such operations plan and key performance indicators.

(4) In addition to the report required in subsection (3) of this section, the department shall update the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature on or before each March 15, June 15, and September 15, regarding the elements of the operations plan described in subdivisions (a), (d), (e), (f), and (m) of subsection (2) of this section, of any substantial changes planned before the next report, and of any substantial changes that have occurred to such facilities or programs. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit or prevent the department from acting in accordance with sections 43-428 to 43-430 in the event of an emergency.

Laws 2020, LB1140, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB428, § 1.